lexd_components/hye-nouns_paradigms.lexd
#!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
#!!!  M O R P H O T A C T I C S  !!!
#!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

# I don't use zero affixes for nominative or accusative
# I don't separate syncretic genitive and dative
# Not making եան declension because obsolete
# Not making եաց class From Hagopian grammar

#GAGA GAGA!	 2026: do wiktionary transclusion from ik tempaltes and others

########################################
########################################
########################################
### NOUN PARADIGMS
########################################
########################################
########################################
########################################

# TO DO: add attributive morphology but it's really hard to know what its distribution is: Dum-Tragut 2009 page 553, and it's mostly limited to spoken speech
# TO DO: remove repetition in output like ամիսը by reorganizing declensions based on Number

#All the main declension systems
PATTERNS
OpenClassRegularNounDeclCanBeBare
OpenClassRegularNounDeclCantBeBare
NounDeclIrregularU
NounDeclNamesFinalI
InfinitivalDecl
RegNounFinalVowelDeclension

#suffix-based declensions
NounDeclUtjunSuffix
NounDeclUmSuffix

#Full-declension patterns

NounDeclIrregPolyWithN
NounDeclIrregularTimeVan
NounDeclOldOch
NounDeclOldFamilyOAblaut


# Dative+oblique only patterns
NounDeclOldAnForm
NounDeclFamilyNkForm
NounDeclOldRandomOAblaut
NounDeclCountry

#Irregular words
NounDeclIrregArchaicVowelReduction
NounDeclIrregReduceNer

NounDeclIrregReduce


##########################
##########################

PATTERN OpenClassRegularNounDeclCanBeBare
#This is for bucket of nouns that get similar enough inflection
# This includes regular nouns,   names, and quantifiers that are nominalized even when bare
# postpositions
#This excludes irregular U, and infinitivals
#This excludes adverbs/adjectives and participles that are nominalized when non-bare


OpenClassRegularNounDeclCanBeBareStem NSg0 CaseDefIDeclension
OpenClassRegularNounDeclCanBeBareStem RegPluralDeclension

PATTERN OpenClassRegularNounDeclCanBeBareStem
NounReg NZero NouNinflBoundary
NounReg NZero NouNinflBoundaryRed # Dir/LR optionally undergoes vowel reduction or never

NounRegPreferReduce NZero NouNinflBoundaryRed  # preferably undergoes vowel reduction
NounRegPreferReduce NZero NouNinflBoundary # Dir/LR optionally rejects vowel reduction


#GAGA GAGA!	DeclinablePostposition  NouNinflBoundary

# For names or proper nouns. Don't have the NouNInflBoundary to block glide deletion
#Country names  are in separate category because some of them take -ia suffix

NameBaseNotCountry NouNinflBoundary

#GAGA GAGA!	# quantifiers and question words are explained in the pronoun lexd
#GAGA GAGA!	Quantifier [<prn><qnt>:]
#GAGA GAGA!	QuestionWords [<prn>:] ([<rel>:]|[<itg>:])
#GAGA GAGA!	QuantifierQuestionWords [<prn><qnt>:] ([<itg>:])?
#GAGA GAGA!	StrictQuestionWords [<prn><itg>:]

PATTERN NameBaseNotCountry
NameMaleGiven [<np><ant><m>:]
NameFemaleGiven [<np><ant><f>:]

NameFamily  [<np><cog>:]
NameGivenUnclassified [<np><ant>:]
NameNotGivenCountry [<np><al>:]




PATTERN CaseDefIDeclension
#This is case/def slots where dative is -i
#Used by regular nouns
# def is optional even on bare form
(Def|Poss)?
CaseRegI_DefPoss?
AttributiveGenIDef
AttributiveInst

PATTERN CaseDefIDeclensionWithOvertcase
#This is case/def slots where dative is -i
# Used by այնպիսի nouns
# the case slot is overtly filled
CaseRegI_DefPoss
AttributiveGenIDef
AttributiveInst

PATTERN CaseDefI_OnlyGenDat
DatGenRegI (Def|Poss)?

PATTERN CaseDefUDeclension
#This is case/def slots where dative is -u
#Used by irregular nouns
# def is optional even on bare form
(Def|Poss)?
CaseRegU_DefPoss?
AttributiveGenUDef
AttributiveInst

PATTERN CaseDefUDeclensionWithOvertcase
#This is case/def slots where dative is -u
#Used by irregular nouns
# the case slot is overtly filled
CaseRegU_DefPoss
AttributiveGenUDef
AttributiveInst


PATTERN DeclUWithFixedDef
#This is case-def where dative is -u and the noun can't be bare, like an infinitival
#Hye-style means that Dat gets Def, but the other cases don't
Def|Poss
CaseRegU_DefPoss
AttributiveGenUDef
AttributiveInst

PATTERN RegNounPluralFormDeclension # plural
NPlReg CaseDefIDeclension

PATTERN RegNounPluralFormDeclensionNerOnly # plural
NPlNerOnly CaseDefIDeclension



PATTERN CaseRegIObliqueWithoutGenAndDefPoss
OblRegI  Poss?
OblRegI Def # Dir/LR
PATTERN CaseRegUObliqueWithoutGenAndDefPoss
OblRegU Poss?
OblRegU Def # Dir/LR

 
PATTERN CaseDefDatGenArchaicAn
DatGenArchaicAn (Def|Poss)? 

#GAGA GAGA!	PATTERN PluralPossessiveDeclension # plural possessive
#GAGA GAGA!	PossPl CaseRegPostPluralPoss? Def|Poss
#GAGA GAGA!	InsReg PossPl  Def|Poss

PATTERN RegPluralDeclension
# plural
RegNounPluralFormDeclension
#GAGA GAGA!	# plural possessive
#GAGA GAGA!	NSg0|NPlReg PluralPossessiveDeclension
#GAGA GAGA!	#Not doing combo of plural possessive and of attributive because weird



##########################
##########################
PATTERN OpenClassRegularNounDeclCantBeBare
#This is for bucket of words that get regular nominal inflection when not bare
# This includes  adverbs/adjectives and participles that are nominalized when non-bare
# interjctions, nubmers


OpenClassRegularNounDeclCantBeBareStem NSg0 RegNounCaseIDeclensionWithReqDef
OpenClassRegularNounDeclCantBeBareStem RegPluralDeclension

#For bookkeeping, I have bare adjectives/adverbs here without any substantivization
AdjAdvBaseDegreedPrefersNotReduce
AdjAdvBaseDegreedPrefersToReduce
AdjAdvBaseDegreedMonoNer
AdjAdvBaseDegreedWithAlternationsIBase
AdjAdvBaseDegreedWithAlternationsUBase

# adj քաղցրի քաղցրներ
AdjAdvMonoNerDeclStem NSg0 RegNounCaseIDeclensionWithReqDef
AdjAdvMonoNerDeclStem RegNounPluralFormDeclensionNerOnly

# make sure to duplicate in the poly final i section for adjectives like անճոռնի անճոռնու
AdjAdvDeclStemWithAlternations



PATTERN OpenClassRegularNounDeclCantBeBareStem
ParticipleDeclStem
AdjAdvDeclStem
#GAGA GAGA!	DeclDeclinableInterjection SubstZero NouNinflBoundary
#GAGA GAGA!	NumericalBase|CardinalFraction SubstZero  NouNinflBoundary
#GAGA GAGA!	# NumericalBase|CardinalFraction SubstZero  NouNinflBoundaryRed # I don't think these reduce Dir LR
#GAGA GAGA!	ClassicalOrdinals [<num><ord>:]  SubstZero  NouNinflBoundary
#GAGA GAGA!	AdverbialPronounDeclinable AdvZero SubstZero  NouNinflBoundary

PATTERN ParticipleDeclStem
ParticipleInflectable SubstZero NouNinflBoundary
(:Neg ParticipleInflectable Neg:) SubstZero NouNinflBoundary

PATTERN ParticipleInflectable
ResultPart
SubjectPart
ProspectivePart



PATTERN AdjAdvDeclStem
AdjAdvBaseDegreedPrefersNotReduce SubstZero NouNinflBoundary
AdjAdvBaseDegreedPrefersNotReduce SubstZero NouNinflBoundaryRed # Dir/LR
AdjAdvBaseDegreedPrefersToReduce SubstZero NouNinflBoundary # Dir/LR
AdjAdvBaseDegreedPrefersToReduce SubstZero NouNinflBoundaryRed 

PATTERN AdjAdvMonoNerDeclStem
AdjAdvBaseDegreedMonoNer SubstZero NouNinflBoundary
AdjAdvBaseDegreedMonoNer SubstZero NouNinflBoundaryRed # Dir/LR

PATTERN AdjAdvBaseDegreedPrefersNotReduce
#Adj with or without superlative prefix
AdjAdvBaseSimplePrefersNotReduce
:AdjSuper AdjAdvBaseSimplePrefersNotReduce AdjSuper:

PATTERN AdjAdvBaseDegreedPrefersToReduce
#Adj with or without superlative prefix
AdjAdvBaseSimplePrefersToReduce
:AdjSuper AdjAdvBaseSimplePrefersToReduce AdjSuper:

PATTERN AdjAdvBaseDegreedMonoNer
#Adj with or without superlative prefix
AdjAdvBaseMonoNer
:AdjSuper AdjAdvBaseMonoNer AdjSuper:

PATTERN AdjAdvBaseSimplePrefersToReduce
#Bare adjectives
AdjRegPrefersToReduce AdjZero
#Derived adverbs
AdjReg AdvOren # Dir/LR
AdjReg NouNinflBoundaryRed AdvOren

PATTERN AdjAdvBaseSimplePrefersNotReduce
#Bare adjectives
AdjReg AdjZero
#Bare adverbs
AdvReg AdvZero

#Derived adverbs
AdjReg AdvOren
AdjReg NouNinflBoundaryRed AdvOren # Dir/LR

PATTERN AdjAdvBaseMonoNer
#Bare adjectives քաղցր
AdjMonoWithNer AdjZero

#Derived adverbs
AdjMonoWithNer AdvOren
AdjMonoWithNer NouNinflBoundaryRed AdvOren # Dir/LR



PATTERN AdjAdvDeclStemWithAlternations
# had to duplicate adj/adv system for nouns like անճոռնի-անճոռնու

# nouns where final ի turns to zero preferably
# and then dat/abl uses ու ուց
# անճոռնին, cannot appear bare
AdjAdvBaseDegreedWithAlternationsIBase SubstZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 (Def|Poss)

# անճոռնու  անճոռնուց անճոռնով անճոռնում
AdjAdvBaseDegreedWithAlternationsIChanged SubstZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0  CaseDefUDeclensionWithOvertcase

#  անճոռնիով  անճոռնիում, 
AdjAdvBaseDegreedWithAlternationsIBase SubstZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 CaseDefIDeclensionWithOvertcase # Dir/LR

# անճոռնիներ
AdjAdvBaseDegreedWithAlternationsIBase SubstZero NouNinflBoundary   RegNounPluralFormDeclension

# pattern for թթու թթվի
# had to duplicate from noun pattern


# թթուն
AdjAdvBaseDegreedWithAlternationsUBase SubstZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 (Def|Poss)

#  թթվի թթուի
AdjAdvBaseDegreedWithAlternationsUChanged SubstZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 CaseDefIDeclensionWithOvertcase
AdjAdvBaseDegreedWithAlternationsUBase SubstZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 CaseDefIDeclensionWithOvertcase # Dir/LR

# թթուներ
AdjAdvBaseDegreedWithAlternationsUBase SubstZero NouNinflBoundary RegNounPluralFormDeclension

PATTERN AdjAdvBaseDegreedWithAlternationsIBase
#Adj with or without superlative prefix
AdjAdvBaseSimpleWithAlternationsIBase
:AdjSuper AdjAdvBaseSimpleWithAlternationsIBase AdjSuper:

PATTERN AdjAdvBaseDegreedWithAlternationsIChanged
#Adj with or without superlative prefix
AdjAdvBaseSimpleWithAlternationsIChanged
:AdjSuper AdjAdvBaseSimpleWithAlternationsIChanged AdjSuper:

PATTERN AdjAdvBaseSimpleWithAlternationsIBase
#Bare adjectives
AdjRegPolyIFinalZeroBase_U_Uts AdjZero

#Derived adverbs
AdjRegPolyIFinalZeroBase_U_Uts AdvOren # Dir/LR
AdjRegPolyIFinalZeroChanged_U_Uts  AdvOren 

PATTERN AdjAdvBaseSimpleWithAlternationsIChanged
#Bare adjectives
AdjRegPolyIFinalZeroChanged_U_Uts AdjZero
#Derived adverbs
AdjRegPolyIFinalZeroChanged_U_Uts AdvOren # Dir/LR
AdjRegPolyIFinalZeroChanged_U_Uts  AdvOren 


PATTERN AdjAdvBaseDegreedWithAlternationsUBase
#Adj with or without superlative prefix
AdjAdvBaseSimpleWithAlternationsUBase
:AdjSuper AdjAdvBaseSimpleWithAlternationsUBase AdjSuper:

PATTERN AdjAdvBaseDegreedWithAlternationsUChanged
#Adj with or without superlative prefix
AdjAdvBaseSimpleWithAlternationsUChanged
:AdjSuper AdjAdvBaseSimpleWithAlternationsUChanged AdjSuper:

PATTERN AdjAdvBaseSimpleWithAlternationsUBase
#Bare adjectives
AdjRegPolyUFinalVBase AdjZero

#Derived adverbs
AdjRegPolyUFinalVBase AdvOren # Dir/LR
AdjRegPolyUFinalVChanged  AdvOren 

PATTERN AdjAdvBaseSimpleWithAlternationsUChanged
#Bare adjectives
AdjRegPolyUFinalVChanged AdjZero
#Derived adverbs
AdjRegPolyUFinalVChanged AdvOren # Dir/LR
AdjRegPolyUFinalVChanged  AdvOren 




PATTERN RegNounFinalVowelDeclension
# nouns with final ու which turn to վ preferably
# կատու կատուն; ձու ձուն
# distinguish between mono and poly
# include oddballs like ամուսին
NounRegMonoUFinalVBase NZero NouNinflBoundary (Def|Poss)?
NounRegPolyUFinalVBase NZero NouNinflBoundary (Def|Poss)?

#  կատվի կատուի; ձվի ձուի 
NounRegMonoUFinalVChanged NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 CaseDefIDeclensionWithOvertcase
NounRegMonoUFinalVBase NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 CaseDefIDeclensionWithOvertcase # Dir/LR

NounRegPolyUFinalVChanged NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 CaseDefIDeclensionWithOvertcase
NounRegPolyUFinalVBase NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 CaseDefIDeclensionWithOvertcase # Dir/LR

# ձվեր ձուեր
NounRegMonoUFinalVChanged NZero NouNinflBoundary RegNounPluralFormDeclension
NounRegMonoUFinalVBase NZero NouNinflBoundary RegNounPluralFormDeclension # Dir/LR

# կատուներ
NounRegPolyUFinalVBase NZero NouNinflBoundary RegNounPluralFormDeclension

# nouns where final ի turns to zero preferably
# and then dat/abl uses ու ուց
# գինի գինին
NounRegPolyIFinalZeroBase_U_Uts NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 (Def|Poss)?
